New Jersey, session 221, A5187.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Authorized employee means an authorized employee, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1997, c.357 (C.27:25-5.6). Opioid antidote means any drug, regardless of dosage amount or method of administration, which has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of an opioid overdose.  Opioid antidote includes, but is not limited to, naloxone hydrochloride, in any dosage amount, which is administered through nasal spray or any other FDA-approved means or methods. Opioid overdose means an acute condition that a layperson would reasonably believe to require medical assistance, which condition includes, but is not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, or death resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid drug or another substance with which an opioid drug was combined. Train set means a locomotive and any accompanying light railcar, passenger car, or other car in the train or a string of connected light rail cars. 2.    a.  The New Jersey Transit Corporation, in consultation with the Deputy Commissioner of Public Health Services, shall establish a two-year pilot program to provide an opioid antidote on every light rail train set that operates in the southern part of the State for the purpose of responding to an opioid overdose. b.    Under the pilot program, the corporation shall: (1) obtain a supply of an opioid antidote and distribute the supply in quantities and types deemed adequate by the corporation, in consultation with the Department of Health, to every light rail train set; (2) maintain one or more secure and easily accessible locations on each light rail train set for storage of an opioid antidote which, when the storage is opened, shall send a silent alert to the train operator to notify the train operator of a potential opioid overdose; (3) stock each location described in paragraph (2) of this subsection with at least two doses of an opioid antidote; (4) ensure that the opioid antidote is appropriately maintained and made available at all times while the light rail train set is in operation and used for light rail service; and (5) mark the location of each supply of the opioid antidote with a prominent sign in both English and Spanish and include an informational card on how to recognize an opioid overdose, how to administer the opioid antidote in response to an opioid overdose, and how to contact emergency assistance. c.     Upon receiving notice of a potential opioid overdose by the silent alert mechanism described in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, the train operator shall contact emergency services at the nearest light rail station. d.    The corporation shall require authorized employees, contractors, and any other staff members on a light rail train set to: (1)   perform routine checks on the opioid antidote locations; (2) maintain a record of the supply of the opioid antidote on each light rail train set, the maintenance of each location, and any emergency uses of the opioid antidote; and (3) conduct maintenance, as needed. e.     Under the pilot program, the corporation shall not require an authorized employee, contractor, or any other staff member on light rail train sets to administer an opioid antidote in the event of an opioid overdose or receive specialized training on how to administer an opioid antidote. 3.    Within six months of the expiration of the two-year pilot program, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall prepare a written report of the effectiveness of the pilot program and recommendations on whether to implement a permanent program Statewide, which report shall be submitted to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. 4.    There is appropriated $100,000 from the General Fund to the New Jersey Transit Corporation to defray any costs incurred by the corporation to implement this act. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment and shall expire upon submission of the report required to be prepared and submitted pursuant to section 3 of this act.